Colorado, session 2026A, SB151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-203, amend (1)
introductory portion; repeal (1.5); and add (1)(h) as follows:
24-51-203. Board - composition and election.
(1) The board consists of the following fifteen SIXTEEN trustees:
(h) ONE TRUSTEE ELECTED BY THE DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS
DIVISION THROUGH A DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS ELECTION ADMINISTERED BY
THE ASSOCIATION. THE TRUSTEE POSITION CREATED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(1)(h) EXISTS SO LONG AS THE DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS DIVISION REMAINS
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

AS A SEPARATE DIVISION OF THE ASSOCIATION. THE TRUSTEE ELECTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(h) MUST BE A MEMBER OR RETIREE OF
THE DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS DIVISION. EFFECTIVE JUNE 1, 2026, THE
TRUSTEE ELECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)(h) IS A VOTING
MEMBER OF THE BOARD.
(1.5) In addition to the board members specified in subsection (1)
of this section, there shall be one ex officio board member from the Denver
public schools division. The ex officio board member shall be elected by the
Denver public schools division through a Denver public schools division
member election administered by the association. The Denver public
schools division ex officio member position exists so long as the Denver
public schools division remains as a separate division of the association.
The Denver public schools division ex officio member shall be a member
or retiree of the Denver public schools division and shall be treated like all
other members of the board, subject to the following:
(a) The ex officio member may sit with the board and participate in
discussions of agenda items, but shall not be allowed to vote on any matter
coming before the board or any committee of the board, or to make any
motion regarding any matter before the board or any committee of the
board;
(b) The ex officio member may be reimbursed for his or her actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the execution of his or her duties as an
ex officio member of the board, subject to the same requirements and
restrictions as apply to reimbursement of expenses of statutory members of
the board;
(c) The ex officio member's fiduciary obligations and
responsibilities shall be the same as any other board member, shall flow to
the entire association membership, and are not limited to those of the
Denver public schools division;
(d) The ex officio member shall be provided the same board and
committee meeting materials as are provided to other members of the board,
including any information that may be deemed confidential;
(e) The ex officio member shall be allowed to participate in or
attend executive or closed sessions of the board or of any committee of the
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-151

board subject to all association board rules, regulations, and policies,
including, but not limited to, confidentiality and conflict of interest;
(f) The ex officio member may not be elected as an officer of the
board;
(g) At the request of the ex officio member, the chair of the board
may appoint the ex officio member as an ex officio member of any standing
committee of the board;
(h) The ex officio member shall be allowed to attend and participate
in any open meeting discussion at any board or committee meeting; and
(i) The ex officio member shall observe all rules, regulations, and
policies applicable to members of the board and any other conditions,
restrictions, or requirements established or directed by vote of a majority of
the members of the board.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-51-309 as
follows:
24-51-309. Affiliation by public entities.
Except as otherwise provided in section 24-51-320, any political
subdivision within the state of Colorado or any public agency created by the
state or any of its political subdivisions may make application to the board
to affiliate with the association. Any such entity specified in this section that
previously exempted its employees from membership in the association
may, by ordinance or resolution, apply to the board to be affiliated with the
association. All applications shall be ARE subject to approval by the board,
and upon approval the benefits, duties, and responsibilities of employers
and members shall begin from the date of affiliation with the association.
The Denver public schools division shall include charter schools that
participate in the DPS plan prior to January 1, 2010, and any future charter
schools that are approved by the Denver public schools board of education
and that enter into a charter contract with the Denver public schools board
of education on or after January 1, 2010. The board shall not allow
affiliation into the Denver public schools division of any employer not
approved by the Denver public schools board of education THE DENVER
PUBLIC SCHOOLS DIVISION INCLUDES DENVER SCHOOL OF SCIENCE AND
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-151

TECHNOLOGY CHARTER SCHOOLS, ANY CHARTER SCHOOLS THAT CONTRACT
WITH THE DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS BOARD OF EDUCATION, AND ANY
FUTURE CHARTER SCHOOLS THAT ARE APPROVED BY THE DENVER PUBLIC
SCHOOLS BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THAT ENTER INTO A CHARTER
CONTRACT WITH THE DENVER PUBLIC SCHOOLS BOARD OF EDUCATION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-505, amend
(2)(d) as follows:
24-51-505. Purchase of service credit relating to noncovered
employment.
(2) (d) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, members employed by a public entity affiliated with the
association pursuant to section 24-51-309 may purchase service credit for
years employed by the entity without limit, if the purchase is completed
before the member terminates employment with the entity, and any such
purchase for years employed by the entity in excess of ten years is
completed or installment payments initiated within three years after the date
the employer affiliates with the association or November 1, 2006,
whichever is later.
(II) A MEMBER EMPLOYED BY A DENVER SCHOOL OF SCIENCE AND
TECHNOLOGY CHARTER SCHOOL THAT IS AFFILIATED WITH THE ASSOCIATION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-51-309 MAY PURCHASE SERVICE CREDIT FOR
YEARS EMPLOYED BY THE CHARTER SCHOOL WITHOUT LIMIT IF THE
PURCHASE IS COMPLETED BEFORE THE MEMBER TERMINATES EMPLOYMENT
WITH THE CHARTER SCHOOL AND ANY SUCH PURCHASE FOR YEARS
EMPLOYED BY THE CHARTER SCHOOL IN EXCESS OF TEN YEARS IS COMPLETED
OR INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS ARE INITIATED WITHIN THREE YEARS AFTER
JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-1747, amend
(1)(k) as follows:
24-51-1747. Portability between the Denver public schools
division and the other four divisions within the association - definitions.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-151

(k) "Denver public school district charter school" means a charter
school that was approved before January 1, 2010, by the Denver public
school district board of education and that has employees participating in
the Denver public schools retirement system before January 1, 2010, and
that is certified as a Denver public school district charter school. at the time
of merger "Denver public school district charter school" also means a
charter school approved by the Denver public school board of education. on
or after January 1, 2010 A Denver public school district charter school is
considered an employer within the Denver public schools division.
SECTION 5. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026;
except that sections 1, 5, and 6 of this act take effect June 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-151

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-151